src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ve azmiar ázmian/XxV1V2 azmiar
SFX Ve aznar ázno/XxV3V4 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznes/XxV7V8 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznas/XxV7V8 aznar
SFX Ve aznar ázne/XxV1V2V3V4 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznen/XxV1V2 aznar
SFX Ve aznar áznan/XxV1V2 aznar
SFX Ve azniar áznio/XxV3V4 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznies/XxV7V8 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznias/XxV7V8 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznie/XxV1V2V3V4 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznien/XxV1V2 azniar
SFX Ve azniar áznian/XxV1V2 azniar
SFX Ve aznir ázno/XxV3V4 aznir
SFX Ve aznir áznas/XxV7V8 aznir
SFX Ve aznir ázna/XxV1V2V3V4 aznir
SFX Ve aznir áznan/XxV1V2 aznir
SFX Ve añar áño/XxV3V4 añar
SFX Ve añar áñes/XxV7V8 añar
SFX Ve añar áñas/XxV7V8 añar
SFX Ve añar áñe/XxV1V2V3V4 añar
SFX Ve añar áñen/XxV1V2 añar
SFX Ve añar áñan/XxV1V2 añar
SFX Ve añer áño/XxV3V4 añer
SFX Ve añer áñas/XxV7V8 añer
SFX Ve añer áña/XxV1V2V3V4 añer
SFX Ve añer áñan/XxV1V2 añer
SFX Ve añir áño/XxV3V4 añir
SFX Ve añir áñas/XxV7V8 añir
SFX Ve añir áña/XxV1V2V3V4 añir
SFX Ve añir áñan/XxV1V2 añir
SFX Ve ebar ébo/XxV3V4 ebar
SFX Ve ebar ébes/XxV7V8 ebar
SFX Ve ebar ébas/XxV7V8 ebar
SFX Ve ebar ébe/XxV1V2V3V4 ebar
SFX Ve ebar ében/XxV1V2 ebar
SFX Ve ebar éban/XxV1V2 ebar
SFX Ve ear éo/XxV3V4 ear
SFX Ve ear ées/XxV7V8 ear
SFX Ve ear éas/XxV7V8 ear
SFX Ve ear ée/XxV1V2V3V4 ear
SFX Ve ear éen/XxV1V2 ear
SFX Ve ear éan/XxV1V2 ear
SFX Ve eber ébo/XxV3V4 eber
SFX Ve eber ébas/XxV7V8 eber
SFX Ve eber éba/XxV1V2V3V4 eber
SFX Ve eber éban/XxV1V2 eber
SFX Ve ebir ébo/XxV3V4 ebir
SFX Ve ebir ébas/XxV7V8 ebir
SFX Ve ebir éba/XxV1V2V3V4 ebir
SFX Ve ebir éban/XxV1V2 ebir
SFX Ve eblar éblo/XxV3V4 eblar
SFX Ve eblar ébles/XxV7V8 eblar
SFX Ve eblar éblas/XxV7V8 eblar
SFX Ve eblar éble/XxV1V2V3V4 eblar
SFX Ve eblar éblen/XxV1V2 eblar
SFX Ve eblar éblan/XxV1V2 eblar
SFX Ve ebrar ébro/XxV3V4 ebrar
SFX Ve ebrar ébres/XxV7V8 ebrar
SFX Ve ebrar ébras/XxV7V8 ebrar
SFX Ve ebrar ébre/XxV1V2V3V4 ebrar
SFX Ve ebrar ébren/XxV1V2 ebrar
SFX Ve ebrar ébran/XxV1V2 ebrar
SFX Ve ebriar ébrio/XxV3V4 ebriar
SFX Ve ebriar ébries/XxV7V8 ebriar
SFX Ve ebriar ébrias/XxV7V8 ebriar
SFX Ve ebriar ébrie/XxV1V2V3V4 ebriar
SFX Ve ebriar ébrien/XxV1V2 ebriar
SFX Ve ebriar ébrian/XxV1V2 ebriar
SFX Ve ecar éco/XxV3V4 ecar
SFX Ve ecar éques/XxV7V8 ecar
SFX Ve ecar écas/XxV7V8 ecar
SFX Ve ecar éque/XxV1V2V3V4 ecar
SFX Ve ecar équen/XxV1V2 ecar
SFX Ve ecar écan/XxV1V2 ecar
SFX Ve ecer ézo/XxV3V4 ecer
SFX Ve ecer ézas/XxV7V8 ecer
SFX Ve ecer éza/XxV1V2V3V4 ecer
SFX Ve ecer ézan/XxV1V2 ecer
SFX Ve echar écho/XxV3V4 echar
SFX Ve echar éches/XxV7V8 echar
SFX Ve echar échas/XxV7V8 echar
SFX Ve echar éche/XxV1V2V3V4 echar
SFX Ve echar échen/XxV1V2 echar
SFX Ve echar échan/XxV1V2 echar
SFX Ve eciar écio/XxV3V4 eciar
SFX Ve eciar écies/XxV7V8 eciar
SFX Ve eciar écias/XxV7V8 eciar
SFX Ve eciar écie/XxV1V2V3V4 eciar
SFX Ve eciar écien/XxV1V2 eciar
SFX Ve eciar écian/XxV1V2 eciar
SFX Ve ecir ézo/XxV3V4 ecir
SFX Ve ecir ézas/XxV7V8 ecir
SFX Ve ecir éza/XxV1V2V3V4 ecir
SFX Ve ecir ézan/XxV1V2 ecir
SFX Ve eclar éclo/XxV3V4 eclar
SFX Ve eclar écles/XxV7V8 eclar
SFX Ve eclar éclas/XxV7V8 eclar
SFX Ve eclar écle/XxV1V2V3V4 eclar
SFX Ve eclar éclen/XxV1V2 eclar
SFX Ve eclar éclan/XxV1V2 eclar
SFX Ve ecliar éclio/XxV3V4 ecliar
SFX Ve ecliar éclies/XxV7V8 ecliar
SFX Ve ecliar éclias/XxV7V8 ecliar
SFX Ve ecliar éclie/XxV1V2V3V4 ecliar
SFX Ve ecliar éclien/XxV1V2 ecliar
SFX Ve ecliar éclian/XxV1V2 ecliar
SFX Ve ecriar écrio/XxV3V4 ecriar
SFX Ve ecriar écries/XxV7V8 ecriar
SFX Ve ecriar écrias/XxV7V8 ecriar
SFX Ve ecriar écrie/XxV1V2V3V4 ecriar
SFX Ve ecriar écrien/XxV1V2 ecriar
SFX Ve ecriar écrian/XxV1V2 ecriar
SFX Ve ectar écto/XxV3V4 ectar
SFX Ve ectar éctes/XxV7V8 ectar
SFX Ve ectar éctas/XxV7V8 ectar
SFX Ve ectar écte/XxV1V2V3V4 ectar
SFX Ve ectar écten/XxV1V2 ectar
SFX Ve ectar éctan/XxV1V2 ectar
SFX Ve edar édo/XxV3V4 edar
SFX Ve edar édes/XxV7V8 edar
SFX Ve edar édas/XxV7V8 edar
SFX Ve edar éde/XxV1V2V3V4 edar
SFX Ve edar éden/XxV1V2 edar
SFX Ve edar édan/XxV1V2 edar
SFX Ve eder édo/XxV3V4 eder
SFX Ve eder édas/XxV7V8 eder
SFX Ve eder éda/XxV1V2V3V4 eder
SFX Ve eder édan/XxV1V2 eder
SFX Ve ediar édio/XxV3V4 ediar
SFX Ve ediar édies/XxV7V8 ediar
SFX Ve ediar édias/XxV7V8 ediar
SFX Ve ediar édie/XxV1V2V3V4 ediar
SFX Ve ediar édien/XxV1V2 ediar
SFX Ve ediar édian/XxV1V2 ediar
SFX Ve edir édo/XxV3V4 edir
SFX Ve edir édas/XxV7V8 edir
SFX Ve edir éda/XxV1V2V3V4 edir
SFX Ve edir édan/XxV1V2 edir
SFX Ve edrar édro/XxV3V4 edrar
SFX Ve edrar édres/XxV7V8 edrar
SFX Ve edrar édras/XxV7V8 edrar
SFX Ve edrar édre/XxV1V2V3V4 edrar
SFX Ve edrar édren/XxV1V2 edrar
SFX Ve edrar édran/XxV1V2 edrar
SFX Ve edriar édrio/XxV3V4 edriar
SFX Ve edriar édries/XxV7V8 edriar
SFX Ve edriar édrias/XxV7V8 edriar
SFX Ve edriar édrie/XxV1V2V3V4 edriar
SFX Ve edriar édrien/XxV1V2 edriar
SFX Ve edriar édrian/XxV1V2 edriar
SFX Ve eer éo/XxV3V4 eer
SFX Ve eer éas/XxV7V8 eer
SFX Ve eer éa/XxV1V2V3V4 eer
SFX Ve eer éan/XxV1V2 eer
SFX Ve efrar éfro/XxV3V4 efrar
SFX Ve efrar éfres/XxV7V8 efrar
SFX Ve efrar éfras/XxV7V8 efrar
SFX Ve efrar éfre/XxV1V2V3V4 efrar
SFX Ve efrar éfren/XxV1V2 efrar
SFX Ve efrar éfran/XxV1V2 efrar
SFX Ve efriar éfrio/XxV3V4 efriar
SFX Ve efriar éfries/XxV7V8 efriar
SFX Ve efriar éfrias/XxV7V8 efriar
SFX Ve efriar éfrie/XxV1V2V3V4 efriar
SFX Ve efriar éfrien/XxV1V2 efriar
SFX Ve efriar éfrian/XxV1V2 efriar
SFX Ve egar égo/XxV3V4 egar
SFX Ve egar égues/XxV7V8 egar
SFX Ve egar égas/XxV7V8 egar
SFX Ve egar égue/XxV1V2V3V4 egar
SFX Ve egar éguen/XxV1V2 egar
SFX Ve egar égan/XxV1V2 egar
SFX Ve eglar églo/XxV3V4 eglar
SFX Ve eglar égles/XxV7V8 eglar
SFX Ve eglar églas/XxV7V8 eglar
SFX Ve eglar égle/XxV1V2V3V4 eglar
SFX Ve eglar églen/XxV1V2 eglar
SFX Ve eglar églan/XxV1V2 eglar
SFX Ve egrar égro/XxV3V4 egrar
SFX Ve egrar égres/XxV7V8 egrar
SFX Ve egrar égras/XxV7V8 egrar
SFX Ve egrar égre/XxV1V2V3V4 egrar
SFX Ve egrar égren/XxV1V2 egrar
SFX Ve egrar égran/XxV1V2 egrar
SFX Ve egrir égro/XxV3V4 egrir
SFX Ve egrir égras/XxV7V8 egrir
SFX Ve egrir égra/XxV1V2V3V4 egrir
SFX Ve egrir égran/XxV1V2 egrir
SFX Ve eicar éico/XxV3V4 eicar
SFX Ve eicar éiques/XxV7V8 eicar
SFX Ve eicar éicas/XxV7V8 eicar
SFX Ve eicar éique/XxV1V2V3V4 eicar
SFX Ve eicar éiquen/XxV1V2 eicar
SFX Ve eicar éican/XxV1V2 eicar
SFX Ve eigar éigo/XxV3V4 eigar
SFX Ve eigar éigues/XxV7V8 eigar
SFX Ve eigar éigas/XxV7V8 eigar
SFX Ve eigar éigue/XxV1V2V3V4 eigar
SFX Ve eigar éiguen/XxV1V2 eigar
SFX Ve eigar éigan/XxV1V2 eigar
SFX Ve eimar éimo/XxV3V4 eimar
SFX Ve eimar éimes/XxV7V8 eimar
SFX Ve eimar éimas/XxV7V8 eimar
SFX Ve eimar éime/XxV1V2V3V4 eimar
SFX Ve eimar éimen/XxV1V2 eimar
SFX Ve eimar éiman/XxV1V2 eimar
SFX Ve einar éino/XxV3V4 einar
SFX Ve einar éines/XxV7V8 einar
SFX Ve einar éinas/XxV7V8 einar
SFX Ve einar éine/XxV1V2V3V4 einar
SFX Ve einar éinen/XxV1V2 einar
SFX Ve einar éinan/XxV1V2 einar
SFX Ve eipar éipo/XxV3V4 eipar
SFX Ve eipar éipes/XxV7V8 eipar
SFX Ve eipar éipas/XxV7V8 eipar
SFX Ve eipar éipe/XxV1V2V3V4 eipar
SFX Ve eipar éipen/XxV1V2 eipar
SFX Ve eipar éipan/XxV1V2 eipar
SFX Ve eirar éiro/XxV3V4 eirar
SFX Ve eirar éires/XxV7V8 eirar
SFX Ve eirar éiras/XxV7V8 eirar
SFX Ve eirar éire/XxV1V2V3V4 eirar
SFX Ve eirar éiren/XxV1V2 eirar
SFX Ve eirar éiran/XxV1V2 eirar
SFX Ve eisar éiso/XxV3V4 eisar
SFX Ve eisar éises/XxV7V8 eisar
SFX Ve eisar éisas/XxV7V8 eisar
SFX Ve eisar éise/XxV1V2V3V4 eisar
SFX Ve eisar éisen/XxV1V2 eisar
SFX Ve eisar éisan/XxV1V2 eisar
SFX Ve eitar éito/XxV3V4 eitar
SFX Ve eitar éites/XxV7V8 eitar
SFX Ve eitar éitas/XxV7V8 eitar
SFX Ve eitar éite/XxV1V2V3V4 eitar
SFX Ve eitar éiten/XxV1V2 eitar
SFX Ve eitar éitan/XxV1V2 eitar
SFX Ve eitiar éitio/XxV3V4 eitiar
SFX Ve eitiar éities/XxV7V8 eitiar
SFX Ve eitiar éitias/XxV7V8 eitiar
SFX Ve eitiar éitie/XxV1V2V3V4 eitiar
SFX Ve eitiar éitien/XxV1V2 eitiar
SFX Ve eitiar éitian/XxV1V2 eitiar
SFX Ve eizar éizo/XxV3V4 eizar
SFX Ve eizar éices/XxV7V8 eizar
SFX Ve eizar éizas/XxV7V8 eizar
SFX Ve eizar éice/XxV1V2V3V4 eizar
SFX Ve eizar éicen/XxV1V2 eizar
SFX Ve eizar éizan/XxV1V2 eizar
SFX Ve elar élo/XxV3V4 elar
