src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ast/hunspell/ast_ES.dic
abater/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ablegar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
abrazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acabalgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acantilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acaxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
achismar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acogorrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acoraxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acoxecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
acutar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
adscribir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afeitar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afloxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
afrescar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agarbar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
agregar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aguxanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alcanzar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allabar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
allobazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
alpiñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amamantar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amatagar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
americanizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amoratar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
amostrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anarigonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anidiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
anuyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apanguar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apaxarar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apicalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apistracar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apoltronar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apreciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
apuxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
argumentar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arramaliar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrañar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrefumar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arrepoyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
arripiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
aserrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atabasar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atestayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
atoñilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
avalumar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
axudicar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
añusgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
bater/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
borrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cafetiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
canecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
cartiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
chalar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
choclar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
clasificar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
compendiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
contabilizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
corticar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
curar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
demer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desacostumar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desamorenar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desasobear/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
descocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desemperexilar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desengurullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desfilvanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
desostagar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
deverar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
dormecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
embaruyar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
emburretar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
empontonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encaminar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encaxonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
encollubar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
endorgar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enfurruñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
engordar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enllanar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enrazar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entafarrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entopetiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
entupecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
enzafarrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbariar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esbucinar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escaldopiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escarcaxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escazonar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escomullir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
escuchiquiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfarugar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esfriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esgonciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esllir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
esmocar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espalmar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espaxar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espiezar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
espronunciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estartaguerar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estracalexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
estrumiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
exaguar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
feltrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
forcexar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
fundir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
garullar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
granar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
hispanizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
informatizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llaceriar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
llendar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
maciar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
maquillar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
medrar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
montar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
narboliar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
olecer/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
palucar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
pecar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
piar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
podar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
presuponguer/XxVeVh st:presuponer
querindar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rascuñar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
rebullir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
redimir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
relativizar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
repantillar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
reservar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
retrigar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
riquir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sabotiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
seper/XxVeVh st:saber
soestimar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
sorremangar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
suspirar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tartayar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tiritiar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trallar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
trespirar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
tusir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
ventar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xaracar/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
xunir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
zurdir/VtVaVeVhVjVkVmVr
